ko: 점화 리드 준수 표준: ISO 3808; 지정되지 않음; OEM 동급; SAE J2031; SAE J557; 기타
pt-BR: Cabo de ignição norma de conformidade: ISO 3808; Não especificado; Equivalente a OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Outro
it: Standard di conformità dei cavi di accensione: ISO 3808; Non specificato; Equivalente OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Altro
nb: Samsvarsstandard for tenningskabler: ISO 3808; Ikke spesifisert; OEM-tilsvarende; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Annet
de: Konformitätsstandard für Zündkabel: ISO 3808; Nicht spezifiziert; OEM-Äquivalent; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 點火線合規標準: ISO 3808; 未指定; OEM 同等等級; SAE J2031; SAE J557; 其他
zh-CN: 点火高压线合规标准: ISO 3808; 未指定; 原厂 (OEM) 等效; SAE J2031; SAE J557; 其他
th: มาตรฐานการปฏิบัติตามข้อกำหนดของสายนำจุดระเบิด: ISO 3808; ไม่ระบุ; เทียบเท่า OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; อื่นๆ
vi: Tiêu chuẩn tuân thủ dây dẫn đánh lửa: ISO 3808; Không xác định; Tương đương OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Khác
sv: Efterlevnadsstandard för tändkabel: ISO 3808; Ej specificerad; Motsvarar OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Övrigt
pl: Norma zgodności przewodu zapłonowego: ISO 3808; Nie określono; Zamiennik OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Inne
sl-SI: Standard skladnosti vžigalnega kabla: ISO 3808; Ni določeno; Enakovredno OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Drugo
ro-RO: Standardul de conformitate pentru cablurile de aprindere: ISO 3808; Nespecificat; Echivalent OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Altele
el: Πρότυπο συμμόρφωσης καλωδίων ανάφλεξης: ISO 3808; Δεν καθορίζεται; Ισοδύναμο OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Άλλο
sk-SK: Norma týkajúca sa zapaľovacích káblov: ISO 3808; Nešpecifikované; Ekvivalent OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Iné
bg-BG: Стандарт за съответствие на запалителните кабели: ISO 3808; Не е посочено; OEM еквивалент; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Други
en: Ignition lead compliance standard: ISO 3808; Not specified; OEM equivalent; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Other
hr-HR: Standard sukladnosti kabela za paljenje: ISO 3808; Nije navedeno; OEM ekvivalent; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Ostalo
tr: Ateşleme kablosunun uygun olduğu standart: ISO 3808; Belirtilmemiş; OEM eşdeğeri; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Diğer
lt-LT: Uždegimo laido atitikties standartas: ISO 3808; Nenurodyta; OEM atitikmuo; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Kita
nl: Ontstekingskabel nalevingsnorm: ISO 3808; Niet gespecificeerd; OEM-equivalent; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Overig
es: Estándar de cumplimiento potencial de los cables de encendido: ISO 3808; No especificado; Equivalente OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Otro
fi: Sytytysjohdon vaatimustenmukaisuusstandardi: ISO 3808; Ei määritetty; OEM-vastaava; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Muu
ja: 点火リード線適合基準: ISO 3808; 指定なし; OEM 同等品; SAE J2031; SAE J557; その他
da: Overensstemmelsesstandard for tændkabel: ISO 3808; Ikke specificeret; OEM-tilsvarende; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Andet
hu: A gyújtáskábelekre vonatkozó előírások: ISO 3808; Nincs meghatározva; OEM-egyenértékű; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Egyéb
pt-PT: Oportunidade de ignição potencial conformidade com a norma: ISO 3808; Não especificado; Equivalente ao fabricante (OEM); SAE J2031; SAE J557; Outro
ru: Стандарт соответствия проводов зажигания: ISO 3808; Не указан; Аналог OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Другое
cs: Norma shody zapalovacího kabelu: ISO 3808; Nespecifikováno; Ekvivalent OEM; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Ostatní
fr: Standard de conformité du fil d’allumage: ISO 3808; Non spécifié; Équivalent FEO; SAE J2031; SAE J557; Autre